Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
CHAPTER 175B Kentucky Public Transportation Infrastructure Authority
175B.035.
Development of projects within Kentucky — Project authority — Financial plan — Submission of project for legislative ratification — Membership of project authority — Development agreement — Commonwealth owns project upon bond retirement or termination of partnership.

Potential projects that are within Kentucky may be developed by a project authority as provided in this section, or by a public-private partnership as provided in KRS

175B.037

.

A local government that contains a portion of a proposed project may, by resolution of its governing body, request the state authority to evaluate the establishment of a project authority or a public-private partnership for the purpose of developing a project.

The state authority may request that the department evaluate the proposed project by preparation of a financial plan evaluating all aspects of the proposed project, including:

The most effective location for the project;

The impact on local governments and citizens at the location of or along the path of the project;

A detailed analysis of the proposed cost of the project;

The potential economic impact to the areas affected by the project;

The anticipated level of use of the project;

The amount and duration of per-vehicle tolls;

Expected appropriations from the General Assembly to be used for the project; however, no financial plan shall be submitted or approved which seeks or purports to bind any future General Assembly to appropriate any moneys beyond those appropriated in the most recently enacted biennial highway construction plan;

The ability of a potential contractor or service provider to quickly respond to the needs presented in a major transportation project, and the importance of economic development opportunities represented by the construction of any project under this chapter. In evaluating proposals, preference shall be given to a plan that includes the involvement of small businesses as subcontractors, to the extent that small businesses can provide services in a competitive manner, unless any preference interferes with the qualification for federal funds;

Other sources of funds and expected amounts; and

Any other provisions relating to the construction and financing of the project.

If, based on the project evaluation prepared pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the state authority and the department determine that the development of the project is economically feasible, the state authority shall submit the proposal to the General Assembly for ratification. If ratified by the General Assembly, the state authority may request that the Governor establish a project authority in accordance with the following:

The project authority shall be established as an independent de jure municipal corporation and political subdivision of the Commonwealth constituting a governmental agency and instrumentality of the Commonwealth, with the power to contract and be contracted with, acquire and convey property, sue and be sued, and exercise all of the usual powers of corporations not inconsistent with the authority’s specifically enumerated purpose and duties;

The project authority shall adopt a name that includes the name of the project and the words “Project Authority”;

The project authority shall be composed of seven (7) members, three (3) of whom shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate in accordance with KRS

11.160

, and four (4) of whom shall be appointed by the chief executive of the local government that requested establishment of the project authority and confirmed by resolution of the local government’s governing body;

Each member of the project authority shall be appointed for a period of four (4) years, except that in making initial appointments, the Governor shall appoint members for one (1), three (3), and four (4) years, and the chief executive shall appoint two (2) members each for two (2) and four (4) years; and

At least one (1) of the Governor’s appointees and two (2) of the chief executive’s appointees shall be familiar with road and bridge design or financing and administration of transportation infrastructure projects.

Within ninety (90) days of its establishment under subsection (4) of this section, the project authority shall convene and organize. The project authority shall elect a chair and a vice chair, who shall be members of the project authority and elected by a majority of the project authority members. The project authority shall appoint a secretary and a treasurer who shall not be members of the project authority, each of whom shall serve at the pleasure of the project authority and shall receive compensation as determined and paid by the project authority.

The treasurer shall give bond in an amount prescribed by the project authority to the project authority and the state conditioned upon a faithful accounting for all the funds coming into the treasurer’s custody, with corporate surety given by a surety company qualified to do business in the state, the premium of which shall be paid by the project authority.

The project authority shall maintain an office, and the secretary of the project authority shall maintain in that office complete records of all the project authority’s actions and proceedings, which shall be considered open records under KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

A project authority shall comply with the applicable provisions of KRS Chapter 45A in the development of a project and the procurement of goods and services.

The meetings of a project authority shall be considered open meetings pursuant to KRS

61.805

to

61.850

.

A majority of the members of a project authority shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The members of a project authority shall receive no compensation for their services in that capacity, but shall be entitled to reimbursement for all reasonable expenses necessarily incurred in connection with performance of their duties and functions as members.

Members of a project authority shall be considered public servants subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 11A.

The following individuals or entities shall be prohibited from entering into any contract or agreement with a project authority or a public-private partnership:

Any member of a project authority, a bi-state authority, the state authority, or a public-private partnership;

Any spouse, child, stepchild, parent, stepparent, or sibling of a member of a project authority, a bi-state authority, the state authority, or a public- private partnership; and

Any corporation, limited liability entity, or other business entity of which a person identified in subparagraph 1. or 2. of this paragraph is an owner, a member, a partner, or has any other ownership interest.

The state authority shall enter into a development agreement with a project authority or a public-private partnership to establish the terms and conditions under which a project will be undertaken. No financial plan shall be submitted or approved which seeks or purports to bind any future General Assembly to appropriate any moneys beyond those appropriated in the most recently enacted biennial highway construction plan.

The development agreement shall establish the duties, responsibilities, and powers of the state authority, the project authority, a public-private partnership, and, as necessary, the cabinet with regard to the project.

The development agreement shall include, at a minimum, all information necessary relating to the creation, development, operation, and disposal of the project. No financial plan shall be submitted or approved which seeks or purports to bind any future General Assembly to appropriate any moneys beyond those appropriated in the most recently enacted biennial highway construction plan.

After the proposed project has been approved and set forth in the development agreement, it shall not be changed or expanded without evaluation and approval by the state authority and ratification by the General Assembly.

Additional agreements may be executed, as necessary, between the state authority, the project authority, a public-private partnership, the department, and the cabinet.

The provisions of this chapter relating to the duties, responsibilities, powers, and authorities of the state authority shall apply to a project authority or a public-private partnership to the extent that the duties, responsibilities, powers, and authorities are required for the project authority or public-private partnership to carry out its duties and responsibilities under a development agreement.

Upon retirement of all bonds associated with a project developed under this section or, if the project utilizes a public-private partnership, upon termination of that partnership, the ownership of the project shall be transferred to the Commonwealth pursuant to KRS

175B.095

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 81, effective June 26, 2009; 2016 ch. 67, § 12, effective April 8, 2016; 2017 ch. 132, § 10, effective March 27, 2017.

175B.037.
Use of public-private partnership — Requirements — Administrative regulations.

The state authority, a bi-state authority, or a project authority may, with approval of the General Assembly pursuant to KRS 175B.020(10), and if applicable, KRS 175B.030(9), utilize a public-private partnership.

An authority utilizing a public-private partnership shall continue to be responsible for oversight of any function authorized by this chapter that is delegated to or otherwise performed by a public-private partnership.

A public-private partnership shall not be used to circumvent any requirements or restrictions placed upon any authority pursuant to this chapter.

An authority proposing to utilize a public-private partnership shall include in the financial plan required by KRS

175B.030

or

175B.035

:

The parameters of the public-private partnership agreement;

The duties and responsibilities to be performed by the private partner or partners;

The methods of oversight to be employed by the authority;

The duties and responsibilities of the project that are to be performed by the authority, the cabinet, and any other partners to the agreement; and

Other information required by the state authority or the cabinet to evaluate the financial plan and the proposed public-private partnership.

A private entity desiring to be a private partner shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the state authority and the cabinet that it is capable of performing any function to be authorized by the public-private partnership.

A public-private partnership authorized or utilized pursuant to this section shall be subject to KRS 176B.030(5) to (8).

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations detailing the procurement approach and proposal review process to be used for a public-private partnership by December 31, 2016.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 67, § 10, effective April 8, 2016.

175B.040.
Tolls and other revenues to be derived from projects — Sinking fund — Pledges of sinking fund — Use and disposition of moneys — Project users to pay appropriate toll — Penalties — Confidentiality of toll collection customer account information.

If imposed as part of the financing plan, tolls shall be fixed and adjusted by the developing authority to provide a fund sufficient with other revenues, if any, to:

Pay the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating the project, unless the cost or any part thereof is being paid by the Commonwealth as authorized by this chapter;

Pay the principal of and interest on the project revenue bonds; and

Create reserves not to exceed amounts specified in the development agreement.

Unless a transfer of ownership of a project occurs pursuant to KRS

175B.095

or the project utilizes a public-private partnership pursuant to KRS

175B.030

and

175B.037

, the developing authority shall at all times maintain ownership and control of all tolls and other revenues generated by the project. Tolls shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any other department, division, authority, board, bureau, or agency of a local government or the Commonwealth.

The tolls and all other revenues derived from the project, except those revenues necessary to:

Pay the cost of maintenance, repair, and operation;

Establish and maintain reserves as may be provided for in the authorization of the issuance of the project revenue bonds or in the trust indenture securing the project revenue bonds; or

Satisfy the requirements of a public-private partnership agreement or a development agreement;

shall be set aside in a sinking fund which shall be pledged to, and charged with, the payment of principal and interest on the project revenue bonds as they become due, and the redemption price or the purchase price of project revenue bonds retired by call or purchase as provided in the authorization of issuance.

The pledge of the sinking fund shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made.

The tolls or other revenues received and pledged by the developing authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery or further action, and the lien on any pledge shall be valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the developing authority, whether the parties have received notice or not.

Neither the proceedings nor any trust indenture by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded, except in the records of the issuing authority.

The use and disposition of moneys to the credit of the sinking fund shall be subject to the provisions of the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the project revenue bonds or the trust indenture.

Every person utilizing a project developed and tolled under this chapter shall pay the appropriate toll.

Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection shall be subject to the provisions of administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS 175B.015(12).

Upon receiving notice, the cabinet shall suspend or withhold the annual registration of a vehicle used in the commission of a toll violation until:

The fine, charge, or assessment has been paid; or

The violation of subsection (4) of this section has been determined not to have occurred.

Toll collection customer account information shall be confidential and not subject to disclosure under KRS

61.870

to

61.884

. Contracts relating to toll collection for a project developed and tolled under this chapter shall ensure the confidentiality of all toll collection customer account information.

For the purposes of this section, “toll collection customer account information” means any information collected or received from or about any person who is assessed a toll, including contact information, payment information, trip data, and any other relevant data.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 82, effective June 26, 2009; 2013, ch. 38, § 2, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 67, § 11, effective April 8, 2016.

175B.045.
Required standards for completed projects.

Each project, upon completion, shall continuously constitute a link between parts of the highway system of the Commonwealth, or between the Commonwealth and any state adjoining the Commonwealth, and shall always be open to public travel, subject to any tolls or restrictions established by the developing authority. All projects shall be subject to evaluation and inspection by the department, and shall meet the standards for public roadways established by the department.

Projects may be developed in coordination with existing and proposed public transit systems.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 83, effective June 26, 2009; 2016 ch. 67, § 15, effective April 8, 2016.

175B.050.
Permitted construction activities — Permitted entry upon lands, waters, and premises for necessary construction work — Administrative regulations concerning public utility facilities.

A project developed by an authority under this chapter may include construction of grade separations at intersections of any project or projects with public highways and changing and adjusting the lines and grades of the highways so as to accommodate them to the design of the grade separation, with the approval of the department.

If a project developed by an authority results in the need to change the location or grade of any portion of any public highway, it shall be reconstructed at a location that the authority and the department deem most favorable.

Any highway relocated under this subsection shall be rebuilt of substantially the same type and in as good condition as the original highway.

Any public highway affected by the construction of any project may be vacated or relocated as a part of the project, with the approval of the department, in the manner provided by law for the vacation or relocation of public roads.

The developing authority and its authorized agents and employees may with proper notice enter upon any lands, waters, and premises in the Commonwealth for the purpose of making any surveys, soundings, drillings, and examinations necessary for the purposes of this chapter. This entry shall not be deemed a trespass, nor shall an entry for these purposes be deemed an entry under any condemnation proceedings which may be then pending.

The developing authority shall reimburse the owners for any actual damage resulting to lands, waters, and premises as a result of these activities on behalf of the developing authority.

The state authority may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A for the installation, construction, maintenance, repair, renewal, relocation, and removal of public utility facilities.

If the developing authority determines that it is necessary for any public utility facilities which now are located in, on, along, over, or under the project to be relocated or be removed, the public utility owning or operating the facilities shall relocate or remove them in accordance with the requirements of the Public Service Commission.

In case of a relocation or removal of facilities, the public utility owning or operating the facility and its successors or assigns may maintain and operate these facilities and the necessary appurtenances in the new location, for as long a period and upon the same terms and conditions as it had the right to maintain and operate the facilities in the former location.

A utility may establish its lines or properties within the right-of-way of a project which has been constructed or is owned, maintained, or operated by an authority only upon approval by the authority.

A utility may connect its lines with businesses and other installations permitted by an authority to exist upon the right-of-way of a project.

A developing authority may contract with any person, partnership, association, or corporation desiring the incidental use of any part of the project, including the right-of-way adjoining the project, for the limited purpose of placing telecommunications equipment, power lines, or other utilities, and to fix the terms, conditions, rents, and rates of charges for that use.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 84, effective June 26, 2009.

175B.055.
Agreements for use of project authority lands.

The Commonwealth may enter into agreements with an authority regarding the use of any lands owned by it, including lands lying under water, which are deemed by the authority to be necessary for the construction or operation of any project.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 85, effective June 26, 2009.

175B.060.
Issuance of project revenue bonds — Use of bond proceeds.

An issuing authority may, by resolution, authorize the issuance of project revenue bonds for the purpose of paying the cost of a project.
(1) (a) 1. An issuing authority may, by resolution, authorize the issuance of project revenue bonds for the purpose of paying the cost of a project.

The principal of and the interest on the project revenue bonds shall be payable solely from the funds provided for the payment.

The bonds of each issue:

Shall be dated;

Shall bear interest at a rate or method of determining rates;

Shall mature at a time not exceeding forty (40) years from their issuance date, as determined by the issuing authority; and

May be redeemable before maturity, at the option of the issuing authority, at a price and under terms and conditions as may be fixed by the issuing authority prior to the issuance of the project revenue bonds.

The issuing authority shall:

Determine the form of the bonds;

Fix the denomination of the bonds; and

Fix the place of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the Commonwealth.

The project revenue bonds shall be signed by the chairman or other presiding officer of the issuing authority or shall bear that officer’s facsimile signature, and the seal of the issuing authority or a facsimile shall be affixed to the project revenue bonds and attested by the secretary of the issuing authority.

If any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature appears on any project revenue bonds ceases to be an officer before the delivery of the project revenue bonds, the signature or facsimile shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes as if the officer had remained in office until the delivery.

All project revenue bonds issued under this chapter shall have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the negotiable instruments law of the Commonwealth.

The project revenue bonds shall be issued in registered form.

The issuing authority may sell the project revenue bonds in a manner, either at public or private sale, and for a price as it determines will best carry out the purposes of this chapter.

The proceeds of the project revenue bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the project or projects for which the bonds were issued, and shall be disbursed in a manner and under the restrictions the issuing authority provides in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the project revenue bonds or in the trust agreement securing the project revenue bonds.

If the proceeds of the project revenue bonds of any issue, by error of estimates or otherwise, are less than the cost of the project or projects, additional project revenue bonds may be issued to provide the amount of the deficit, and, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the project revenue bonds or in the trust agreement securing the project revenue bonds, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the project revenue bonds first issued.

If the proceeds of the project revenue bonds of any issue exceed the cost, the surplus shall be deposited to the credit of the sinking fund required by KRS 175B.040(3)(a) for the project revenue bonds or any account or accounts the issuing authority shall have provided for in the proceedings or trust indenture authorizing and securing the project revenue bonds.

Project revenue bonds shall be issued in compliance with KRS

42.420

and

45A.840

to

45A.879

. Except as provided in KRS

42.420

and

45A.840

to

45A.879

, project revenue bonds may be issued under this chapter without obtaining the consent of any local government, department, division, authority, board, bureau, or agency of the Commonwealth, or of the Commonwealth, and without any other proceedings or conditions other than those proceedings or conditions which are specifically required by this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 86, effective June 26, 2009.

175B.065.
Project revenue bonds not a debt or pledge of faith and credit of the Commonwealth or its subdivisions — Statement on face of bonds.

Project revenue bonds issued by an authority under this chapter shall not constitute a debt of the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions. Project revenue bonds issued pursuant to this chapter, shall be payable solely from the funds provided for in this chapter including but not limited to the funds described in KRS 175B.025(1)(c).

Project revenue bonds shall contain on their face a statement to the effect that neither the Commonwealth nor the issuing authority shall be obligated to pay the bonds or the interest thereon, except from any and all revenues associated with the project for which they are issued, and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the Commonwealth is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on these project revenue bonds.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 87, effective June 26, 2009.

175B.070.
Project revenue bonds may be secured by trust agreement — Permissible provisions.

Any project revenue bonds issued under this chapter may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the issuing authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the Commonwealth. Subject to the restrictions established in KRS

175B.060

, the trust indenture or other document providing for the issuance of the project revenue bonds may pledge or assign the tolls and other revenues to be received, but shall not convey or mortgage any project or any part of a project.

The trust indenture or other document may contain any provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as are reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the developing authority and the issuing authority in relation to the acquisition of property and the construction, improvement, maintenance, repair, operation, and insurance of the project for which the project revenue bonds were authorized; the rates of toll or rentals to be charged; and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys.

Any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth which acts as depository of the proceeds of project revenue bonds or of revenues may furnish indemnifying project revenue bonds or pledge securities as the issuing authority requires. Any such trust indenture may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. Any trust indenture or proceedings may contain any other provisions that the issuing authority deems reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of the trust indenture or proceedings may be treated as a part of the cost of the operation of the project.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 88, effective June 26, 2009.

175B.075.
Moneys received under chapter are trust funds — Permitted investment of project revenue bond proceeds.

All moneys received under this chapter, whether as proceeds from the sale of project revenue bonds or revenues, shall be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this chapter. The trust indenture or any other document authorizing the issuance of project revenue bonds or the collection of any revenues shall provide that any officer, bank, or trust company with which the moneys are deposited shall act as trustee of the moneys and shall hold and apply them for the purposes outlined in this chapter, subject to the provisions of this chapter and the proceedings or trust indenture.

The proceeds of project revenue bonds shall only be invested in direct obligations of the United States of America and direct federal agency obligations or other similar obligations to the extent that the full faith and credit of the United States of America is pledged for the timely payment thereof. Direct obligations shall include money market mutual funds that invest solely in the obligations referenced in this subsection.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 89, effective June 26, 2009.

175B.080.
Operation and maintenance of projects constitute performance of essential governmental functions — Tax-free status of projects and project revenue bonds.

The exercise of the powers granted by this chapter shall be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the Commonwealth, for the increase of their commerce and prosperity, and for the improvement of their health and living conditions. Because the operation and maintenance of projects by any authority created pursuant to this chapter will constitute the performance of essential governmental functions:

An authority shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon any project or any property acquired or used by the authority under this chapter or upon the income therefrom; and

The project revenue bonds issued under this chapter, their transfer, and the income therefrom shall at all times be free from taxation within the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 90, effective June 26, 2009.

175B.085.
Project revenue bonds are authorized investment securities.

Project revenue bonds issued by an authority under this chapter shall be securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons who are authorized to invest in bonds or other similar obligations, including capital in their control or belonging to them, are authorized to invest. The project revenue bonds shall be securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the Commonwealth is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 91, effective June 26, 2009.

175B.090.
Maintenance and repair of projects — Restoration of or compensation for damaged private property — Permitted leases.

Each project constructed or operated under this chapter shall be maintained and kept in good condition and repair by the developing authority, which may contract with the department or with any local highway department for maintenance of a project.

All private property damaged or destroyed in carrying out the powers granted by this chapter shall be restored or repaired and placed in its original condition as nearly as practicable or adequate compensation shall be made out of funds provided under this chapter.

All counties, cities, towns, and other political subdivisions and all public agencies and commissions of the Commonwealth, notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, may lease, lend, grant, or convey to an authority any real property which may be necessary or convenient to the effectuation of the authorized purposes of the authority, including public roads and other real property already devoted to public use.

In obtaining property under this chapter, an authority shall pursue the acquisition under the procedures and mandates of KRS

416.540

to

416.670

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 92, effective June 26, 2009.

175B.095.
Evaluation of project condition prior to bond retirement — Evaluation of tolls upon transfer of ownership — Transfer of funds — Actions required prior to and upon bond retirement or termination of partnership.

Not more than one (1) year prior to the scheduled retirement of all bonds issued to finance a project, the department shall undertake an evaluation of the condition of the project to determine if the project has significant maintenance, reconstruction, or rebuilding needs. The evaluation shall be completed no less than one hundred eighty (180) days prior to the scheduled retirement of the bonds.

If significant maintenance, reconstruction, or rebuilding is needed, the department shall determine if funds and reserves held by the developing authority for the project are adequate to accomplish the maintenance, reconstruction, or rebuilding. If additional funds are needed, additional bonds shall be authorized and issued by the same entity that issued the original bonds for the project, pursuant to this chapter.

Tolls for the project shall continue until all bonds are retired.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, any portion of a project located within the Commonwealth and financed by an authority shall become the property of the Commonwealth upon the retirement of all bonds issued to finance the project or, if the project utilizes a public-private partnership, upon termination of that partnership.

Upon the transfer of any project to the Commonwealth pursuant to this section, the department shall evaluate the need for the continuance of any tolls. Tolls may be continued if significant rebuilding, expansion, or maintenance is needed. Tolls collected after ownership of a project has transferred to the Commonwealth shall be deposited into the road fund and used for current and future costs of the project, including maintenance, expansion, rebuilding, reconstruction, or other similar purposes.

When an authority has transferred a project to the Commonwealth pursuant to this section, remaining fund reserves relating to that project shall be transferred to the road fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 93, effective June 26, 2009; 2016 ch. 67, § 13, effective April 8, 2016.

175B.100.
Annual report by state authority — Annual audit of state authority.

Within ninety (90) days after the expiration of each fiscal year, the state authority shall make an annual report of its activities for the preceding fiscal year to the Controller of the Commonwealth within the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Transportation Cabinet, and the Legislative Research Commission. The report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering its operation during the fiscal year.

The state authority shall cause an audit of its books and accounts to be made at least once each year.

A request shall be made to the Auditor of Public Accounts for the performance of an annual audit. If the Auditor of Public Accounts declines in writing to assume responsibility for performing the audit or fails to respond in writing within thirty (30) days of receiving the request, the state authority may enter into a contract with a certified public accountant for an audit.

Any contract with a certified public accountant entered into as a result of the Auditor of Public Accounts either declining to assume responsibility of performing the audit or failing to respond within thirty (30) days of receipt of a written request for an audit shall specify the following:

That the certified public accountant shall forward a copy of the audit report and management letters to the Auditor of Public Accounts for review;

That the Auditor of Public Accounts may review the certified public accountant’s work papers; and

That after review of the certified public accountant’s work papers, if discrepancies are found, the Auditor of Public Accounts shall notify the authority of the discrepancies. If the certified public accountant does not correct these discrepancies prior to the release of the audit, the Auditor of Public Accounts may conduct its own audit to verify the findings of the certified public accountant’s report.

If an audit verifying the findings of the certified public accountant’s report is conducted by the Auditor of Public Accounts, the total audit expense incurred shall be an allowable expenditure and shall be paid to the Auditor of Public Accounts. If the audit conducted by the Auditor of Public Accounts discloses discrepancies in the audit by the certified public accountant, the findings of the Auditor of Public Accounts shall be deemed official for all purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 94, effective June 26, 2009.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/26/2009). The internal numbering of subsection (2) of this statute has been altered in codification by the Reviser of Statutes from the way it appeared in 2009 (1st Extra. Sess.) Ky. Acts ch. 1, sec. 94, under the authority of KRS

7.136

.

175B.105.
Conflict of interest for officers or employees of an authority.

Officers or employees of an authority shall not have any direct interest in the sale or purchase of any project revenue bonds authorized by that authority. Violation of this section shall be punishable by fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 95, effective June 26, 2009.

175B.110.
Indemnification from liability for an authority’s board members, officers, and employees.

Board members, officers, and employees of each authority authorized under this chapter shall be indemnified from liability asserted by any person on the bonds or notes of the authority, or any personal liability or accountability by reason of:

The issuance of bonds, notes, or guarantees;

The acquisition, construction, ownership, or operation of any project funded in whole or part by the authority; or

Any other action taken or the failure to act by the authority.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 96, effective June 26, 2009.

175B.115.
Project planning or work done prior to establishment of an authority.

For a project for which preliminary planning or other work has been undertaken prior to the establishment of an authority, the authority shall follow all previous agreements, records of decision, or contracts entered into by the Commonwealth, subject to any modification necessary as a result of the implementation of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 97, effective June 26, 2009.